Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3704
Hearing; person's rights.

At each hearing conducted pursuant to sections 29-3701 to 29-3703, the person shall be entitled to assistance of counsel and such additional rights as are guaranteed by the laws and Constitution of the State of Nebraska and by the United States Constitution.

Laws 1981, LB 213, § 6.

Due process in review hearings is guaranteed under this section. State v. Hayden, 237 Neb. 286, 466 N.W.2d 66 (1991).

The rights one enjoys at a section 29-3703 hearing include adherence by the court to the Nebraska Evidence Rules and the right of appellant to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses. State v. Hayden, 237 Neb. 286, 466 N.W.2d 66 (1991).